Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Standard Valuation Law Policies and Contracts
§ 26-6-206.
Computation of minimum standard for annuities; computation of minimum standard valuation by calendar year of issue.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section the minimum standard of valuation for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on or after the operative date of this section as defined in subsection (b) of this section, and for annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after that operative date under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall be the commissioners’ reserve valuation method defined in W.S. 26-6-205(c), (d) and (e) and the following tables and interest rates:

For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued:

Prior to May 20, 1981, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts, the 1971 individual annuity mortality table, or any modification of this table the commissioner approves, with six percent (6%) interest for single premium immediate annuity contracts and four percent (4%) interest for all other individual annuity and pure endowment contracts;

On or after May 20, 1981, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts, the 1971 individual annuity mortality table or any individual annuity mortality table the National Association of Insurance Commissioners adopts after 1980 and is approved by regulation the commissioner promulgates for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those contracts, or any modification of these tables the commissioner approves, and seven and one-half percent (7 1/2%) interest for single premium immediate annuity contracts, five and one-half percent (5 1/2%) interest for single premium deferred annuity and pure endowment contracts and four and one-half percent (4 1/2%) interest for all other individual annuity and pure endowment contracts.

For annuities and pure endowments purchased:

Prior to May 20, 1981 under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under those contracts, the 1971 group annuity mortality table, or any modification of this table the commissioner approves, and six percent (6%) interest;

On or after May 20, 1981 under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under those contracts, the 1971 group annuity mortality table or any group annuity mortality table the National Association of Insurance Commissioners adopts after 1980 and the commissioner approves for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those annuities and pure endowments, or any modification of these tables the commissioner approves, and seven and one-half percent (7 1/2%) interest.

Annuities and pure endowments purchased in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1995, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts; and

The net increase, if any, in a particular calendar year after January 1, 1995, in amounts held under guaranteed interest contracts shall be the calendar year statutory valuation interest rates as defined in this subsection.

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall apply.

For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis:

GUARANTEEDURATION YEARS WEIGHTING FACTOR FOR PLAN TYPE A B C 5 or less: .80 .60 .50 More than 5, but not more than 10: .75 .60 .50 More than 10, but not more than 20: .65 .50 .45 More than 20: .45 .35 .35

Click to view

PLAN TYPE A B C For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis, the factors shown in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph increased by: .15 .25 .05

Click to view

PLAN TYPE A B C
For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis (other than those with no cash settlement options) which do not guarantee interest on considerations received more than one (1) year after issue or purchase and for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis which do not guarantee interest rates on considerations received more than twelve (12) months beyond the valuation date, the factors shown in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph or derived in subdivision (II) of this subparagraph increased by: .05 .05 .05

Click to view

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, the guarantee duration is the number of years for which the contract guarantees interest rates in excess of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for life insurance policies with guarantee duration in excess of twenty (20) years. For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the guarantee duration is the number of years from the date of issue or date of purchase to the date annuity benefits are scheduled to commence;

Plan type as used in the tables in this subparagraph is defined as follows:

Plan Type A: At any time policyholder may withdraw funds only (1) with an adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, or (2) without such adjustment but in installments over five (5) years or more, or (3) as an immediate life annuity, or (4) no withdrawal permitted.

Plan Type B: Before expiration of the interest rate guarantee, policyholder may withdraw funds only (1) with an adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or assets values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, or (2) without such adjustment but in installments over five (5) years or more, or (3) no withdrawal permitted. At the end of interest rate guarantee, funds may be withdrawn without such adjustment in a single sum or installments over less than five (5) years.

Plan Type C: Policyholder may withdraw funds before expiration of interest rate guarantee in a single sum or installments over less than five (5) years either without adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company, or subject only to a fixed surrender charge stipulated in the contract as a percentage of the fund.

A company may elect to value guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options and annuities with cash settlement options on either an issue year basis or on a change in fund basis. Guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options and other annuities with no cash settlement options must be valued on an issue year basis. As used in this subsection, an issue year basis of valuation refers to a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum valuation standard for the entire duration of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of issue or year of purchase of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract, and the change in fund basis of valuation refers to a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum valuation standard applicable to each change in the fund held under the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of the change in the fund.

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of the change in the fund, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

The interest rates used in determining the minimum standard for the valuation of:
(b) (i) The interest rates used in determining the minimum standard for the valuation of:

(A)

Life insurance policies issued in a particular calendar year, on or after the operative date of W.S.

26-16-209

;

(B)

Individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1995;

Any insurer may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with this section after a specified date before January 1, 1979, which is the operative date of this section for that insurer. An insurer may elect a different operative date for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts from that elected for group annuity and pure endowment contracts. If an insurer makes no election, the operative date of this section for that insurer is January 1, 1979.

(ii)

The calendar year statutory valuation interest rates, I, shall be determined as follows and the results rounded to the nearer one-fourth percent (1/4%):

(A)

For Life Insurance,

I = . 03 + W R1 - .03 + W R2 - .09 ;

Click to view

(B)

For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and from guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options;

I = .03 + W R - .03

Click to view

Where

R1

is the lesser of

R

and

.09

,

R2

is the greater of

R

and

.09

,

R

is the reference interest rate defined in this subsection, and

W

is the weighting factor defined in this subsection;

(C)

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on an issue year basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the formula for life insurance stated in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall apply to annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee durations in excess of ten (10) years and the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall apply to annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee duration of ten (10) years or less;

(D)

For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall apply;

(iii)

However, if the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for any life insurance policies issued in any calendar year determined without reference to this sentence differs from the corresponding actual rate for similar policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year by less than one-half percent (1/2%), the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for such life insurance policies shall be equal to the corresponding actual rate for the immediately preceding calendar year. For purposes of applying the immediately preceding sentence, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for life insurance policies issued in a calendar year shall be determined for 1980 (using the reference interest rate defined for 1979) and shall be determined for each subsequent calendar year regardless of when W.S.

26-16-209

becomes operative;

(iv)

The weighting factors referred to in the formulas stated above are given in the following tables:

(A)

Weighting factors for life insurance:

GUARANTEEDURATION() YEARS WEIGHTING FACTORS 10 or less .50 More than 10, but not more than 20 .45 More than 20 .35

Click to view

For life insurance, the guarantee duration is the maximum number of years the life insurance can remain in force on a basis guaranteed in the policy or under options to convert to plans of life insurance with premium rates or nonforfeiture values or both which are guaranteed in the original policy;

(B)

Weighting factor for single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options:

.80

(C)

Weighting factors for other annuities and for guaranteed interest contracts, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, shall be as specified in tables (I), (II) and (III) of this subparagraph, according to the rules and definitions in subdivisions (IV), (V) and (VI) of this subparagraph:

(v)

The reference interest rate referred to in paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection shall be defined as follows:

(A)

For life insurance, the lesser of the average over a period of thirty-six (36) months and the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year next preceding the year of issue, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

(B)

For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or year of purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

(C)

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, with guarantee duration in excess of ten (10) years, the lesser of the average over a period of thirty-six (36) months and the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

(D)

For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as stated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, with guarantee duration of ten (10) years or less, the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

(E)

For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the average over a period of twelve (12) months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

(vi)

If the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds is no longer published by Moody’s Investor’s Service, Inc., or if the National Association of Insurance Commissioners determines that the monthly average of the composite yield on seasoned corporate bonds as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. is no longer appropriate for the determination of the reference interest rate, then an alternative method for determination of the reference interest rate, which is adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and approved by regulation promulgated by the commissioner, may be substituted.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 104; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-104; Laws 1975, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-111; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 190, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2017 ch. 67, § 2, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “standard of valuation for individual” for “standard for the valuation of all individual”; in (a)(ii), deleted “all” preceding “annuities”; deleted “All” at the beginning of (b)(i)(A) through (b)(i)(C); and in in (b)(v)(A), deleted “all” preceding “life insurance.”

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-207.
Minimum standards for accident and health insurance contracts including disability plans.

The commissioner shall promulgate regulations containing the minimum standards applicable to the valuation of accident and health contracts, including disability plans, issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual. For accident and health insurance contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the standard prescribed in the valuation manual is the minimum standard of valuation required under W.S. 26-6-202(e).

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 2017 ch. 67, § 2, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-208.
Actuarial opinion of reserves.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 3.

Actuarial opinions issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual shall be governed by the following provisions:

Every life insurer doing business in this state shall annually submit the opinion of a qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified by the commissioner by regulation are computed appropriately, are based on assumptions which satisfy contractual provisions, are consistent with prior reported amounts and comply with applicable laws of this state. The commissioner by regulation shall define the specifics of this opinion and add any other items deemed to be necessary to its scope;

Every life insurer, except as exempted by regulation, shall also annually include in the opinion required by paragraph (i) of this subsection, an opinion of the same qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified by the commissioner by regulation, when considered in light of the assets held by the insurer with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, make adequate provision for the insurer’s obligations under the policies and contracts including the benefits under and expenses associated with the policies and contracts. The commissioner may provide by regulation for a transition period for establishing any higher reserves which the qualified actuary deems necessary in order to render the opinion required by this section;

Each opinion required by paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be governed by the following provisions:

A memorandum, in form and substance acceptable to the commissioner as specified by regulation, shall be prepared to support each actuarial opinion;

If the insurer fails to provide a supporting memorandum at the request of the commissioner within a period specified by regulation or the commissioner determines that the supporting memorandum provided by the insurer fails to meet the standards prescribed by regulation or is unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the insurer to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and prepare any supporting memorandum required by the commissioner.

Every opinion required by this subsection shall be governed by the following provisions:

The opinion shall be submitted with the annual statement reflecting the valuation of reserve liabilities for each year ending on or after December 31, 1995;

The opinion shall apply to all business in force including individual and group health insurance plans, in form and substance acceptable to the commissioner as specified by regulation;

The opinion shall be based on standards adopted by the actuarial standards board and on additional standards as the commissioner by regulation prescribes;

In the case of an opinion required to be submitted by a foreign or alien insurer, the commissioner may accept the opinion filed by that insurer with the insurance supervisory official of another state if the commissioner determines that the opinion reasonably meets the requirements applicable to an insurer domiciled in this state;

Except in cases of fraud, willful misconduct or negligence the qualified actuary shall not be liable for damages to any person, other than the insurer and the commissioner, for any act, error, omission, decision or conduct with respect to the actuary’s opinion;

Disciplinary action by the commissioner against the insurer or the qualified actuary shall be in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

;

Any memorandum in support of the opinion, and any other material provided by the insurer to the commissioner in connection with the opinion, shall be kept confidential by the commissioner, may be shared as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d), and shall not be made public other than for the purpose of defending an action seeking damages from any person by reason of any action required by this section or by regulations promulgated under this section. Once any portion of the confidential memorandum is cited by the insurer in its marketing or is cited before any governmental agency other than a state insurance department or is released by the insurer to the news media, no portion of the memorandum shall be confidential. The memorandum or other material may otherwise be released by the commissioner:

With the written consent of the insurer; or

To the American Academy of Actuaries upon request stating that the memorandum or other material is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and setting forth procedures satisfactory to the commissioner for preserving the confidentiality of the memorandum or other material.

For the purposes of this subsection, “qualified actuary” means a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries and who meets requirements prescribed by regulation of the commissioner.

Actuarial opinions of reserves issued after the operative date of the valuation manual shall be governed by the following provisions:

Every insurer with outstanding life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts or deposit type contracts in this state and subject to regulation by the commissioner shall annually submit the opinion of the appointed actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts are computed appropriately, based on assumptions that satisfy contractual provisions, consistent with prior reported amounts and comply with applicable laws of this state;

Every insurer with outstanding life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts or deposit type contracts in this state and subject to regulation by the commissioner, except as exempted in the valuation manual, shall also annually include in the opinion required by paragraph (i) of this subsection, an opinion of the same appointed actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified in the valuation manual, when considered in light of the assets held by the insurer with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items including the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, make adequate provision for the insurer’s obligations under the policies and contracts including the benefits under and expenses associated with the policies and contracts;

Each opinion required by paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be governed by the following provisions:

A memorandum, in form and substance as specified in the valuation manual and acceptable to the commissioner, shall be prepared to support each actuarial opinion;

If the insurer fails to provide a supporting memorandum at the request of the commissioner within a period specified in the valuation manual or the commissioner determines that the supporting memorandum provided by the insurer fails to meet the standards prescribed by the valuation manual or is otherwise unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the insurer to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and prepare the supporting memorandum required by the commissioner.

Every opinion required by this subsection shall be governed by the following provisions:

The opinion shall be in form and substance as specified in the valuation manual and acceptable to the commissioner;

The opinion shall be submitted with the annual statement reflecting the valuation of such reserve liabilities for each year ending on or after the operative date of the valuation manual;

The opinion shall apply to all policies and contracts subject to paragraph (ii) of this subsection, plus other actuarial liabilities as may be specified in the valuation manual;

The opinion shall be based on standards adopted by the actuarial standards board or its successor, and on any additional standards as may be prescribed in the valuation manual;

In the case of an opinion required to be submitted by a foreign or alien insurer, the commissioner may accept the opinion filed by that insurer with the insurance supervisory official of another state if the commissioner determines that the opinion reasonably meets the requirements applicable to an insurer domiciled in this state;

Except in cases of fraud or willful misconduct, the appointed actuary shall not be liable for damages to any person, other than the insurer and the commissioner, for any act, error, omission, decision or conduct with respect to the appointed actuary’s opinion;

Disciplinary action by the commissioner against the insurer or the appointed actuary shall be in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2004, ch. 14, § 2; 2017 ch. 67, §§ 2, 3, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), inserted the language beginning “when considered in light of the assets” and ending “retained under the policies and contracts.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 67, § 2, added (g) and (h).

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 67, § 3, repealed former (a) through (f).

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-209.
Valuation manual for policies and contracts; amendments to manual; rules on minimum valuation standards; actuarial examinations.

For policies or contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the standard prescribed in the valuation manual is the minimum standard of valuation required under W.S. 26-6-202(e), except as provided under subsection (e) or (g) of this section.

The operative date of the valuation manual is January 1, 2017.

Unless an amendment in the valuation manual specifies a later effective date, amendments to the valuation manual shall be effective on January 1 following the date when all of the following have occurred:

The change to the valuation manual has been adopted by the NAIC by an affirmative vote representing:

At least three-fourths (3/4) of the members of the NAIC voting, but not less than a majority of the total membership; and

Members of the NAIC representing jurisdictions totaling greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of the direct premiums written as reported in the following annual statements most recently available prior to the vote in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph:

Life, accident and health annual statements;

Health annual statements; or

Fraternal annual statements.

The valuation manual shall specify all of the following:

Minimum valuation standards for and definitions of the policies or contracts subject to W.S. 26-6-202(e). The minimum valuation standards shall be:

The commissioner’s reserve valuation method for life insurance contracts, other than annuity contracts, subject to W.S. 26-6-202(e);

The commissioner’s reserve valuation method for annuity contracts subject to W.S. 26-6-202(e); and

Minimum reserves for all other policies or contracts subject to W.S. 26-6-202(e).

Which policies or contracts or types thereof are subject to the requirements of a principle based valuation under W.S.

26-6-210

(a) and the minimum valuation standards consistent with those requirements;

For policies and contracts subject to a principle based valuation under W.S.

26-6-210

:

Requirements for the format of reports to the commissioner under W.S. 26-6-210(b)(iii), which shall include information necessary to determine if the valuation is appropriate and in compliance with this article;

Assumptions for risks over which the insurer does not have significant control or influence;

Procedures for corporate governance and actuarial function oversight and a process for appropriate waiver or modification of the procedures.

For policies and contracts not subject to a principle based valuation under W.S. 26-6-210, the minimum valuation standard shall either:

Be consistent with the minimum standard of valuation prior to the operative date of the valuation manual; or

Require reserves that quantify the benefits, guarantees, funding and risks associated with the policies or contracts at a level of conservatism that reflects conditions including unfavorable events with a reasonable probability of occurring.

The experience data required under W.S.

26-6-211

including reporting and any data analysis requirements; and

Any other requirement including those relating to reserve methods, models for measuring risk, generation of economic scenarios, assumptions, margins, use of company experience, risk measurement, disclosure, certifications, reports, actuarial opinions and memoranda, transition rules and internal controls.

In the absence of a specific valuation requirement or if a specific valuation requirement in the valuation manual is not in the commissioner’s opinion in compliance with this article, the insurer shall comply with minimum valuation standards prescribed by the commissioner by rule or regulation.

The commissioner may, at the expense of the insurer, engage, employ or contract a qualified actuary to perform an actuarial examination of the insurer and opine on the appropriateness of any reserve assumption or method used by the insurer, or to review and opine on an insurer’s compliance with any requirement set forth in this article. The commissioner may rely upon the opinion of a qualified actuary engaged by the commissioner of another state, district or territory of the United States regarding provisions contained within this article.

The commissioner may require an insurer to change any assumption or method that in the commissioner’s opinion is necessary to comply with the requirements of the valuation manual or this article. An insurer shall adjust the reserves as required by the commissioner. The commissioner may take other disciplinary action as permitted pursuant to W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-210.
Principle based valuation; requirements.

An insurer shall establish reserves using a principle based valuation that meets all of the following conditions for policies or contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual as specified in the valuation manual:

Quantifies the benefits, guarantees, funding and risks associated with the policies or contracts at a level of conservatism that reflects conditions including unfavorable events with a reasonable probability of occurring during the lifetime of the contracts. For policies or contracts with significant tail risk, reflects conditions appropriately adverse to quantify the tail risk;

Incorporates assumptions, risk analysis methods and financial models and management techniques that are consistent with those utilized within the insurer’s overall risk assessment process, while recognizing potential differences in financial reporting structures and any prescribed assumptions or methods;

Incorporates assumptions derived in one (1) of the following manners:

Assumptions prescribed in the valuation manual;

For assumptions not prescribed in the valuation manual, assumptions that:

Use the insurer’s available experience, to the extent it is relevant and statistically credible; or

To the extent that company data on experience is not available, relevant or statistically credible, use other relevant, statistically credible experience.

Provides margins for uncertainty including adverse deviation and estimation error such that the greater the uncertainty the greater the margin and resulting reserve.

An insurer using a principle based valuation for one (1) or more policies or contracts subject to this section as specified in the valuation manual shall:

Establish procedures for corporate governance and oversight of the actuarial valuation function consistent with those described in the valuation manual;

Provide to the commissioner and the insurer’s board of directors an annual certification of the effectiveness of the internal controls with respect to the principle based valuation. The controls shall be designed to assure all material risks inherent in the liabilities and associated assets subject to the valuation are included in the valuation and valuations are made in accordance with the valuation manual. The certification shall be based on the controls in place as of the end of the preceding calendar year;

Develop, and file with the commissioner upon the commissioner’s request, a principle based valuation report that complies with standards prescribed in the valuation manual.

A principle based valuation may include a prescribed formulaic reserve component.

History.

2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-211.
Experience data reporting for policies and contracts.

An insurer shall submit mortality, morbidity, policyholder behavior or expense experience and other data as prescribed in the valuation manual.

History.

2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.